District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0711.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Entertainment Establishment Employee Safety Extension Temporary
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 28-5404 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (3)(C) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and inserting a semicolon in
its place.
(b) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “; or” in its
place.
(c) A new paragraph (5) is added to read as follows:
“(5) Provided that written, conspicuous notice to the public is displayed on the door of
the establishment or menu that cash payments are not accepted, to:
“(A) A retail establishment with a valid on-premises Class C or Class D retailer
license; or
“(B) A restaurant location, as that term is defined in § 25-101(43), that operates:
“(i) Twenty-four hours a day; or
“(ii) At 3:00 am at least 2 days a week.”.
Sec 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2